src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
!! =================================== !
!! The Lithuanian morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! =================================== !

Alphabet
A a Ą ą B b C c Č č D d E e Ę ę Ė ė F f G 
g H h I i Į į Y y J j K k L l M m N n O o 
P p R r S s Š š T t U u Ų ų Ū ū V v Z z Ž ž

! Declarations
 %>
 %^JDEL:0

 ;


Sets

 Vow = a ą e i o u y æ ø å ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z  ; !TO DO: change consonants and vowels
 
Rules

! "Deleting stem-final s in s genitive"
! s:0 <=> Vow s %>: _ ;
! s deleted when... vowel "s" 

"J Deletion"
j:0 <=> i: _ %^JDEL: %> Cns ;
! j goes to null "in the context" ...
! gij^JDEL>ti
! gy00>ti

"I to Y" 
i:y <=> [Cns|.#.] _ j: %^JDEL: %> Cns ; 
! j goes to null "in the context" 
! [Cns|.#.] to the left there must be a consonant or 
! be the start of the word
! we put the suffix boundary to not be too permissive with 
! y to i change. now we will only change when there is a 
! suffix boundary AND a JDEL

"T Deletion to č" ! Should make t to č in +Sg1+Prt
t:č <=> 

! ! this weakens the stem _ompel_ to _ommel_
! %^WGStem:0

!  %^WGStem    !!≈ * **@CODE@**  weak grade



! HarmDummy = %{back%} %{front%} ;

! "g:j"
! !! **Rule: @RULENAME@**
! !! ```
! g:j <=> i _ [ a: ] (HarmDummy:) ( %> i ) %^WGStem:0 ;
! !!€ poiga%^WGStem%>n
! !!€ poija0%>n
! !! ```
